Washington statutes.
RCW 2.06.080

Vacancy, how filled.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of a judge of the court, the governor shall appoint a person to hold the office until the election and qualification of a judge to fill the vacancy, which election shall take place at the next succeeding general election and the judge so elected shall hold the office for the remainder of the unexpired term.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 221 s 8.]